Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.090

Conveyance and acquisition of property—Management—Appraisal.

(1) The board of directors of each school district shall have exclusive control of all school property, real or personal, belonging to the district; said board shall have power, subject to RCW 28A.335.120, in the name of the district, to convey by deed all the interest of their district in or to any real property of the district which is no longer required for school purposes. Except as otherwise specially provided by law, and RCW 28A.335.120, the board of directors of each school district may purchase, lease, receive and hold real and personal property in the name of the district, and rent, lease or sell the same, and all conveyances of real estate made to the district shall vest title in the district.

(2) Any purchase of real property by a school district shall be preceded by a market value appraisal by a professionally designated real estate appraiser as defined in *RCW 74.46.020 or by a general real estate appraiser certified under chapter 18.140 RCW who was selected by the board of directors.

[ 2001 c 183 s 1; 1995 c 358 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 358; 1981 c 306 s 3; 1980 c 115 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.040. Prior: (i) 1947 c 266 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-25, part; prior: 1909 p 265 s 2, part. Formerly RCW 28.57.135, part. (ii) 1969 c 53 s 1, part; 1967 ex.s. c 29 s 1, part; 1967 c 12 s 1, part; 1965 ex.s. c 49 s 1, part; 1963 c 104 s 1, part; 1963 c 5 s 1, part; 1961 c 305 s 1, part; 1961 c 237 s 1, part; 1961 c 66 s 1, part; 1955 c 68 s 2, part. Formerly RCW 28.58.100(3) and (5), part. (iii) 1909 c 97 p 287 s 7, part; RRS s 4782, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 44, part; 1891 c 127 s 11, part; 1890 p 366 s 30, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.040, 28.58.040.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.46.020 was amended by 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 2, deleting the definition of "professionally designated real estate appraiser."

Severability—1981 c 306: See note following RCW 28A.335.180.

Severability—1980 c 115: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 115 s 9.]